New York, session 2025-2026, A8814.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 922 of the education law, as amended by chapter 68 2 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 922. Opioid overdose prevention. 1. School districts, public 4 libraries, boards of cooperative educational services, county vocational 5 education and extension boards, charter schools, and non-public elemen- 6 tary and secondary schools in this state [may] shall provide and main- 7 tain on-site in each instructional school facility or library, opioid 8 antagonists, as defined in section three thousand three hundred nine of 9 the public health law, in quantities and types deemed by the commission- 10 er, in consultation with the commissioner of health, to be adequate to 11 ensure ready and appropriate access for use during emergencies to any 12 student, individual on library premises or staff suspected of having 13 opioid overdose whether or not there is a previous history of opioid 14 abuse. 15 2. School districts, public libraries, boards of cooperative educa- 16 tional services, county vocational education and extension boards, char- 17 ter schools, and non-public elementary and secondary schools in this 18 state [may] shall elect to participate as an opioid antagonist recipient 19 and any person employed by any such entity that has elected to partic- 20 ipate may administer an opioid antagonist in the event of an emergency, 21 provided that such person shall have been trained by a program approved 22 under section three thousand three hundred nine of the public health EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13224-02-6 A. 8814--A 2 1 law. Any school district, public library, board of cooperative educa- 2 tional services, county vocational education and extension board, char- 3 ter school, and non-public elementary and secondary school that has 4 employees trained in accordance with this section shall comply with the 5 requirements of section three thousand three hundred nine of the public 6 health law including, but not limited to, appropriate clinical over- 7 sight, record keeping and reporting. No person shall be required to 8 participate in the program and any participation by an individual shall 9 be voluntary. 10 3. (a) Upon the request of a school district, public library, board of 11 cooperative educational services, county vocational education and exten- 12 sion board, charter school, or non-public elementary and secondary 13 school in this state, the department of health shall provide, at no cost 14 to the recipient and in accordance with the standards, powers and 15 authorizations established by section three thousand three hundred nine 16 of the public health law, opioid antagonists in an amount sufficient for 17 the school district, public library, board of cooperative educational 18 services, county vocational education and extension board, charter 19 school, or non-public elementary and secondary school in this state to 20 be in compliance with this section. 21 (b) The commissioner of health shall establish a process by which a 22 school district, public library, board of cooperative educational 23 services, county vocational education and extension board, charter 24 school, or non-public elementary and secondary school in this state may 25 request such opioid antagonists from the department of health. 26 (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the 27 authority of any such entity to otherwise acquire opioid antagonists 28 pursuant to section three thousand three hundred nine of the public 29 health law or to receive opioid antagonists through its participation as 30 a registered opioid overdose prevention program. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 32 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 33 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 34 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 35 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.